North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 25. Dispositions.

§ 7B-2500.
Purpose.

The purpose of dispositions in juvenile actions is to design an appropriate plan to meet the needs of the juvenile and to achieve the objectives of the State in exercising jurisdiction, including the protection of the public. The court should develop a disposition in each case that:

Promotes public safety;

Emphasizes accountability and responsibility of both the parent, guardian, or custodian and the juvenile for the juvenile’s conduct; and

Provides the appropriate consequences, treatment, training, and rehabilitation to assist the juvenile toward becoming a nonoffending, responsible, and productive member of the community.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 609, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6.

§ 7B-2501.
Dispositional hearing.

The dispositional hearing may be informal, and the court may consider written reports or other evidence concerning the needs of the juvenile. The court may consider any evidence, including hearsay evidence as defined in

G.S. 8C-1

, Rule 801, that the court finds to be relevant, reliable, and necessary to determine the needs of the juvenile and the most appropriate disposition.

The juvenile and the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian shall have an opportunity to present evidence, and they may advise the court concerning the disposition they believe to be in the best interests of the juvenile.

In choosing among statutorily permissible dispositions, the court shall select the most appropriate disposition both in terms of kind and duration for the delinquent juvenile. Within the guidelines set forth in

G.S. 7B-2508

, the court shall select a disposition that is designed to protect the public and to meet the needs and best interests of the juvenile, based upon:

The seriousness of the offense;

The need to hold the juvenile accountable;

The importance of protecting the public safety;

The degree of culpability indicated by the circumstances of the particular case; and

The rehabilitative and treatment needs of the juvenile indicated by a risk and needs assessment.

The court may dismiss the case, or continue the case for no more than six months in order to allow the family an opportunity to meet the needs of the juvenile through more adequate home supervision, through placement in a private or specialized school or agency, through placement with a relative, or through some other plan approved by the court.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 469, s. 18; 1998-202, s. 6; 2003-62, s. 5.

§ 7B-2502.
Evaluation and treatment of undisciplined and delinquent juveniles. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

In any case, the court may order that the juvenile be examined by a physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, or other qualified expert as may be needed for the court to determine the needs of the juvenile.

(a1)

In the case of a juvenile adjudicated delinquent for committing an offense that involves the possession, use, sale, or delivery of alcohol or a controlled substance, the court shall require the juvenile to be tested for the use of controlled substances or alcohol within 30 days of the adjudication. In the case of any juvenile adjudicated delinquent, the court may, if it deems it necessary, require the juvenile to be tested for the use of controlled substances or alcohol. The results of these initial tests conducted pursuant to this subsection shall be used for evaluation and treatment purposes only. In placing a juvenile in out-of-home care under this section, the court shall also consider whether it is in the juvenile’s best interest to remain in the juvenile’s community of residence.

(a2)

In the case of a juvenile with a suspected mental illness, developmental disability, or intellectual disability that has been adjudicated delinquent, the court shall order that the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety make a referral for a comprehensive clinical assessment or equivalent mental health assessment, unless the court finds a comprehensive clinical assessment or equivalent mental health assessment has been conducted within the last 45 days before the adjudication hearing. An assessment ordered by a court under this subsection shall evaluate the developmental, emotional, behavioral, and mental health needs of the juvenile.

(a3)

If an assessment is ordered by the court under subsection (a2) of this section, the court shall review the assessment prior to the date of disposition in the case. If the court finds sufficient evidence that the juvenile has severe emotional disturbance, as defined in G.S. 7B-1501(24a), or a developmental disability, as defined in G.S. 122C-3(12a), or intellectual disability, as defined in G.S. 122C-3(17a), that, in the court’s discretion, substantially contributed to the juvenile’s delinquent behavior, and the juvenile is eligible for a Juvenile Justice Level 3 disposition and/or is recommended for a Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facility (PRTF) placement, the court shall order a care review team to be convened by the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and assigned to the case.

(a4)

If a care review team is assigned to a case by the court under subsection (a3) of this section, the care review team shall develop a recommendation plan for appropriate services and resources that address the identified needs of the juvenile. The care review team shall submit a recommendation to the court within 30 calendar days of the date of the court order convening the care review team. The court shall review the recommendation plan when determining the juvenile’s disposition in accordance with

G.S. 7B-2501(c)

. A care review team shall consist of, at a minimum, all of the following:

The juvenile.

The juvenile’s parents, guardian, or custodian.

Representatives from the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

A representative from the local management entity/managed care organization or prepaid health plan (PHP) in which the juvenile is enrolled.

Representatives from any State agency or local department of social services that is currently providing services to the juvenile or the juvenile’s family.

If the juvenile does not have health insurance coverage for the recommended treatment, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine who should pay the cost of the assessment, evaluation or treatment pursuant to this section. The county manager, or any other person who is designated by the chair of the board of county commissioners, of the county of the juvenile’s residence shall be notified of the hearing, and allowed to be heard. The court shall permit the parent, guardian, custodian, or other responsible persons to arrange for evaluation or treatment. If the parent, guardian, or custodian declines or is unable to make necessary arrangements, the court may order the needed evaluation or treatment, surgery, or care, and the court may order the parent to pay the cost of the care pursuant to Article 27 of this Chapter. If the court finds the parent or funding from the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety is unable to pay the cost of evaluation or treatment, the court shall order the county to arrange for evaluation or treatment of the juvenile and to pay for the cost of the evaluation or treatment.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-123, s. 8(b), effective December 1, 2021, and applicable to petitions filed on or after that date.

A juvenile shall not be committed directly to a State hospital or State developmental center, and orders purporting to commit a juvenile directly to a State hospital or State developmental center, except for an examination to determine capacity to proceed, are void and of no effect.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 469, s. 19; 1985, c. 589, s. 5; c. 777, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 2; 1991, c. 636, s. 19(a); 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 609, s. 3; 1997-516, s. 1A; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, s. 6; 2002-164, s. 4.9; 2019-76, s. 11; 2021-123, s. 8(b).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 7B-2502

.

§ 7B-2502.
Evaluation and treatment of undisciplined and delinquent juveniles. [Effective January 1, 2023]

In any case, the court may order that the juvenile be examined by a physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, or other qualified expert as may be needed for the court to determine the needs of the juvenile.

(a1)

In the case of a juvenile adjudicated delinquent for committing an offense that involves the possession, use, sale, or delivery of alcohol or a controlled substance, the court shall require the juvenile to be tested for the use of controlled substances or alcohol within 30 days of the adjudication. In the case of any juvenile adjudicated delinquent, the court may, if it deems it necessary, require the juvenile to be tested for the use of controlled substances or alcohol. The results of these initial tests conducted pursuant to this subsection shall be used for evaluation and treatment purposes only. In placing a juvenile in out-of-home care under this section, the court shall also consider whether it is in the juvenile’s best interest to remain in the juvenile’s community of residence.

(a2)

In the case of a juvenile with a suspected mental illness, developmental disability, or intellectual disability that has been adjudicated delinquent, the court shall order that the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety make a referral for a comprehensive clinical assessment or equivalent mental health assessment, unless the court finds a comprehensive clinical assessment or equivalent mental health assessment has been conducted within the last 45 days before the adjudication hearing. An assessment ordered by a court under this subsection shall evaluate the developmental, emotional, behavioral, and mental health needs of the juvenile.

(a3)

If an assessment is ordered by the court under subsection (a2) of this section, the court shall review the assessment prior to the date of disposition in the case. If the court finds sufficient evidence that the juvenile has severe emotional disturbance, as defined in G.S. 7B-1501(24a), or a developmental disability, as defined in G.S. 122C-3(12a), or intellectual disability, as defined in G.S. 122C-3(17a), that, in the court’s discretion, substantially contributed to the juvenile’s delinquent behavior, and the juvenile is eligible for a Juvenile Justice Level 3 disposition and/or is recommended for a Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facility (PRTF) placement, the court shall order a care review team to be convened by the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and assigned to the case.

(a4)

If a care review team is assigned to a case by the court under subsection (a3) of this section, the care review team shall develop a recommendation plan for appropriate services and resources that address the identified needs of the juvenile. The care review team shall submit a recommendation to the court within 30 calendar days of the date of the court order convening the care review team. The court shall review the recommendation plan when determining the juvenile’s disposition in accordance with

G.S. 7B-2501(c)

. A care review team shall consist of, at a minimum, all of the following:

The juvenile.

The juvenile’s parents, guardian, or custodian.

Representatives from the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

A representative from the local management entity/managed care organization or prepaid health plan (PHP) in which the juvenile is enrolled.

Representatives from any State agency or local department of social services that is currently providing services to the juvenile or the juvenile’s family.

If the juvenile does not have health insurance coverage for the recommended treatment, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine who should pay the cost of the assessment, evaluation or treatment pursuant to this section. The county manager, or any other person who is designated by the chair of the board of county commissioners, of the county of the juvenile’s residence shall be notified of the hearing, and allowed to be heard. The court shall permit the parent, guardian, custodian, or other responsible persons to arrange for evaluation or treatment. If the parent, guardian, or custodian declines or is unable to make necessary arrangements, the court may order the needed evaluation or treatment, surgery, or care, and the court may order the parent to pay the cost of the care pursuant to Article 27 of this Chapter. If the court finds the parent or funding from the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety is unable to pay the cost of evaluation or treatment, the court shall order the county to arrange for evaluation or treatment of the juvenile and to pay for the cost of the evaluation or treatment.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-123, s. 8(b), effective December 1, 2021, and applicable to petitions filed on or after that date.

A juvenile shall not be committed directly to a State hospital or State developmental center, and orders purporting to commit a juvenile directly to a State hospital or State developmental center, except for an examination to determine capacity to proceed, are void and of no effect.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 469, s. 19; 1985, c. 589, s. 5; c. 777, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 2; 1991, c. 636, s. 19(a); 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 609, s. 3; 1997-516, s. 1A; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, s. 6; 2002-164, s. 4.9; 2019-76, s. 11; 2021-123, s. 8(b); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(vvvv); 2021-189, s. 5.1(j).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 7B-2502

.

§ 7B-2503.
Dispositional alternatives for undisciplined juveniles.

The following alternatives for disposition shall be available to the court exercising jurisdiction over a juvenile who has been adjudicated undisciplined. In placing a juvenile in out-of-home care under this section, the court shall also consider whether it is in the juvenile’s best interest to remain in the juvenile’s community of residence. The court may combine any of the applicable alternatives when the court finds it to be in the best interests of the juvenile:

In the case of any juvenile who needs more adequate care or supervision or who needs placement, the judge may do any of the following:

Require that the juvenile be supervised in the juvenile’s own home by a department of social services in the juvenile’s county of residence, a juvenile court counselor, or other personnel as may be available to the court, subject to conditions applicable to the parent, guardian, or custodian or the juvenile as the judge may specify.

Place the juvenile in the custody of a parent, guardian, custodian, relative, private agency offering placement services, or some other suitable person.

If the director of the department of social services has received notice and an opportunity to be heard, place the juvenile in the custody of a department of social services in the county of the juvenile’s residence, or in the case of a juvenile who has legal residence outside the State, in the physical custody of a department of social services in the county where the juvenile is found so that agency may return the juvenile to the responsible authorities in the juvenile’s home state. An order placing a juvenile in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services shall contain a finding that the juvenile’s continuation in the juvenile’s own home would be contrary to the juvenile’s best interest. This placement shall be reviewed in accordance with

G.S. 7B-906.1

. A parent who is indigent is entitled to court-appointed counsel for representation in the hearings held pursuant to

G.S. 7B-906.1

unless the parent makes a knowing and voluntary waiver of the right to counsel.

Place the juvenile under the protective supervision of a juvenile court counselor for a period of up to three months, with an extension of an additional three months in the discretion of the court.

Excuse the juvenile from compliance with the compulsory school attendance law when the court finds that suitable alternative plans can be arranged by the family through other community resources for one of the following:

An education related to the needs or abilities of the juvenile including vocational education or special education;

A suitable plan of supervision or placement; or

Some other plan that the court finds to be in the best interests of the juvenile.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 469, s. 19; 1985, c. 589, s. 5; c. 777, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 2; 1991, c. 636, s. 19(a); 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 609, s. 3; 1997-516, s. 1A; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, s. 6; 2001-208, s. 8; 2001-487, s. 101; 2001-490, s. 2.19; 2002-164, s. 4.10; 2009-311, s. 16; 2013-129, s. 39; 2017-161, s. 12; 2019-33, s. 15(a).

§ 7B-2504.
Conditions of protective supervision for undisciplined juveniles.

The court may place a juvenile on protective supervision pursuant to

G.S. 7B-2503

so that the juvenile court counselor may (i) assist the juvenile in securing social, medical, and educational services and (ii) visit and work with the family as a unit to ensure the juvenile is provided proper supervision and care. The court may impose any combination of the following conditions of protective supervision that are related to the needs of the juvenile, including:

That the juvenile shall remain on good behavior and not violate any laws;

That the juvenile attend school regularly;

That the juvenile maintain passing grades in up to four courses during each grading period and meet with the juvenile court counselor and a representative of the school to make a plan for how to maintain those passing grades;

That the juvenile not associate with specified persons or be in specified places;

That the juvenile abide by a prescribed curfew;

That the juvenile report to a juvenile court counselor as often as required by a juvenile court counselor;

That the juvenile be employed regularly if not attending school; and

That the juvenile satisfy any other conditions determined appropriate by the court.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 2001-490, s. 2.20.

§ 7B-2505.
Violation of protective supervision by undisciplined juvenile.

On motion of the juvenile court counselor or the juvenile, or on the court’s own motion, the court may review the progress of any juvenile on protective supervision at any time during the period of protective supervision. When the motion is filed during the period of protective supervision and either alleges a violation of protective supervision or seeks an extension of protective supervision as permitted by G.S. 7B-2503(2), the court’s review may occur within a reasonable time after the period of protective supervision ends, and the court shall have jurisdiction to enter an order under this section. The conditions or duration of protective supervision may be modified only as provided in this Subchapter and only after notice and a hearing.

If the court, after notice and a hearing, finds by the greater weight of the evidence that the juvenile has violated the conditions of protective supervision set by the court, the court may do one or more of the following:

Continue or modify the conditions of protective supervision.

Order any disposition authorized by

G.S. 7B-2503

.

Notwithstanding the time limitation in

G.S. 7B-2503

(2), extend the period of protective supervision for up to three months.

History.

1998-202, s. 6; 2001-490, s. 2.21; 2012-172, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-172, s. 5, effective October 1, 2012, rewrote the section.

§ 7B-2506.
Dispositional alternatives for delinquent juveniles.

The court exercising jurisdiction over a juvenile who has been adjudicated delinquent may use the following alternatives in accordance with the dispositional structure set forth in

G.S. 7B-2508

:

In the case of any juvenile under the age of 18 years who needs more adequate care or supervision or who needs placement, the judge may do any of the following:

Require that a juvenile be supervised in the juvenile’s own home by the department of social services in the juvenile’s county, a juvenile court counselor, or other personnel as may be available to the court, subject to conditions applicable to the parent, guardian, or custodian or the juvenile as the judge may specify.

Place the juvenile in the custody of a parent, guardian, custodian, relative, private agency offering placement services, or some other suitable person.

If the director of the county department of social services has received notice and an opportunity to be heard, place the juvenile in the custody of the department of social services in the county of the juvenile’s residence, or in the case of a juvenile who has legal residence outside the State, in the physical custody of a department of social services in the county where the juvenile is found so that agency may return the juvenile to the responsible authorities in the juvenile’s home state. An order placing a juvenile in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services shall contain a finding that the juvenile’s continuation in the juvenile’s own home would be contrary to the juvenile’s best interest. This placement shall be reviewed in accordance with

G.S. 7B-906.1

. A parent who is indigent is entitled to court-appointed counsel for representation in the hearings held pursuant to

G.S. 7B-906.1

unless the parent makes a knowing and voluntary waiver of the right to counsel.

Excuse a juvenile under the age of 16 years from compliance with the compulsory school attendance law when the court finds that suitable alternative plans can be arranged by the family through other community resources for one of the following:

An education related to the needs or abilities of the juvenile including vocational education or special education;

A suitable plan of supervision or placement; or

Some other plan that the court finds to be in the best interests of the juvenile.

Order the juvenile to cooperate with a community-based program, an intensive substance abuse treatment program, or a residential or nonresidential treatment program. Participation in the programs shall not exceed 12 months.

Require restitution, full or partial, up to five hundred dollars ($500.00), payable within a 12-month period to any person who has suffered loss or damage as a result of the offense committed by the juvenile. The court may determine the amount, terms, and conditions of the restitution. If the juvenile participated with another person or persons, all participants should be jointly and severally responsible for the payment of restitution; however, the court shall not require the juvenile to make restitution if the juvenile satisfies the court that the juvenile does not have, and could not reasonably acquire, the means to make restitution.

Impose a fine related to the seriousness of the juvenile’s offense. If the juvenile has the ability to pay the fine, it shall not exceed the maximum fine for the offense if committed by an adult.

Order the juvenile to perform up to 100 hours supervised community service consistent with the juvenile’s age, skill, and ability, specifying the nature of the work and the number of hours required. The work shall be related to the seriousness of the juvenile’s offense and in no event may the obligation to work exceed 12 months.

Order the juvenile to participate in the victim-offender reconciliation program.

Place the juvenile on probation under the supervision of a juvenile court counselor, as specified in

G.S. 7B-2510

.

Order that the juvenile shall not be licensed to operate a motor vehicle in the State of North Carolina for as long as the court retains jurisdiction over the juvenile or for any shorter period of time. The clerk of court shall notify the Division of Motor Vehicles of that order.

Impose a curfew upon the juvenile.

Order that the juvenile not associate with specified persons or be in specified places.

Impose confinement on an intermittent basis in an approved detention facility. Confinement shall be limited to not more than five 24-hour periods, the timing and imposition of which is determined by the court in its discretion.

Order the juvenile to cooperate with placement in a wilderness program.

Order the juvenile to cooperate with placement in a residential treatment facility, an intensive nonresidential treatment program, an intensive substance abuse program, or in a group home other than a multipurpose group home operated by a State agency.

Place the juvenile on intensive probation under the supervision of a juvenile court counselor.

Order the juvenile to cooperate with a supervised day program requiring the juvenile to be present at a specified place for all or part of every day or of certain days. In determining whether to order a juvenile to a particular supervised day program, the court shall consider the structure and operations of the program and whether that program will meet the needs of the juvenile. The court also may require the juvenile to comply with any other reasonable conditions specified in the dispositional order that are designed to facilitate supervision.

Order the juvenile to participate in a regimented training program.

Order the juvenile to submit to house arrest.

Suspend imposition of a more severe, statutorily permissible disposition with the provision that the juvenile meet certain conditions agreed to by the juvenile and specified in the dispositional order. The conditions shall not exceed the allowable dispositions for the level under which disposition is being imposed.

Order that the juvenile be confined in an approved juvenile detention facility for a term of up to 14 24-hour periods, which confinement shall not be imposed consecutively with intermittent confinement pursuant to subdivision (12) of this section at the same dispositional hearing. The timing and imposition of this confinement shall be determined by the court in its discretion.

Order the residential placement of a juvenile in a multipurpose group home operated by a State agency.

Require restitution of more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), full or partial, payable within a 12-month period to any person who has suffered loss or damage as a result of an offense committed by the juvenile. The court may determine the amount, terms, and conditions of restitution. If the juvenile participated with another person or persons, all participants should be jointly and severally responsible for the payment of the restitution; however, the court shall not require the juvenile to make restitution if the juvenile satisfies the court that the juvenile does not have, and could not reasonably acquire, the means to make restitution.

Order the juvenile to perform up to 200 hours supervised community service consistent with the juvenile’s age, skill, and ability, specifying the nature of work and the number of hours required. The work shall be related to the seriousness of the juvenile’s offense.

Commit the juvenile to the Division for placement in a youth development center in accordance with

G.S. 7B-2513

for a period of not less than six months.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 469, ss. 19, 20; 1985, c. 589, s. 5; c. 777, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 2; 1991, c. 353, s. 1; 636, s. 19(a); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 4; 1993, c. 369, s. 1; c. 462, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 609, s. 3; 1997-516, s. 1A; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, s. 6; 1999-444, s. 1; 2000-137, s. 3; 2001-95, s. 5; 2001-179, s. 2; 2001-208, s. 9; 2001-487, s. 101; 2001-490, s. 2.22; 2009-311, s. 17; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2013-129, s. 40; 2015-58, s. 3.2; 2017-57, s. 16D.4(g); 2017-161, s. 13; 2018-142, s. 23(b); 2019-33, s. 15(b).

§ 7B-2507.
Delinquency history levels.

Generally. — The delinquency history level for a delinquent juvenile is determined by calculating the sum of the points assigned to each of the juvenile’s prior adjudications or convictions and to the juvenile’s probation status, if any, that the court finds to have been proved in accordance with this section. For the purposes of this section, a prior adjudication is an adjudication of an offense that occurs before the adjudication of the offense before the court.

Points. — Points are assigned as follows:

For each prior adjudication of a Class A through E felony offense, 4 points.

For each prior adjudication of a Class F through I felony offense or Class A1 misdemeanor offense, 2 points.

(2a)

For each prior conviction of a Class A through E felony offense, 4 points.

(2b)

For each prior conviction of a Class F through I felony or Class A1 misdemeanor offense, excluding conviction of the motor vehicle laws, 2 points.

(2c)

For each prior misdemeanor conviction of impaired driving (G.S. 20-138.1), impaired driving in a commercial vehicle (G.S. 20-138.2), and misdemeanor death by vehicle (G.S. 20-141.4(a2)), 2 points.

For each prior adjudication of a Class 1, 2, or 3 misdemeanor offense, 1 point.

(3a)

For each prior conviction of a Class 1, 2, or 3 misdemeanor offense, excluding conviction for violation of the motor vehicle laws, 1 point.

If the juvenile was on probation at the time of offense, 2 points.

No points shall be assigned for a prior adjudication that a juvenile is in direct contempt of court or indirect contempt of court.

Delinquency History Levels. — The delinquency history levels are:

Low — No more than 1 point.

Medium — At least 2, but not more than 3 points.

High — At least 4 points.

In determining the delinquency history level, the classification of a prior offense is the classification assigned to that offense at the time the juvenile committed the offense for which disposition is being ordered.

Multiple Prior Adjudications or Convictions Obtained in One Court Session. — For purposes of determining the delinquency history level, if a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent or convicted for more than one offense in a single session of district court or more than one offense in a single superior court during one calendar week, only the adjudication or conviction for the offense with the highest point total is used.

Classification of Prior Adjudications or Convictions From Other Jurisdictions. — Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an adjudication or conviction occurring in a jurisdiction other than North Carolina is classified as a Class I felony if the jurisdiction in which the offense occurred classifies the offense as a felony, or is classified as a Class 3 misdemeanor if the jurisdiction in which the offense occurred classifies the offense as a misdemeanor. If the juvenile proves by the preponderance of the evidence that an offense classified as a felony in the other jurisdiction is substantially similar to an offense that is a misdemeanor in North Carolina, the adjudication or conviction is treated as that class of misdemeanor for assigning delinquency history level points. If the State proves by the preponderance of the evidence that an offense classified as either a misdemeanor or a felony in the other jurisdiction is substantially similar to an offense in North Carolina that is classified as a Class I felony or higher, the adjudication or conviction is treated as that class of felony for assigning delinquency history level points. If the State proves by the preponderance of the evidence that an offense classified as a misdemeanor in the other jurisdiction is substantially similar to an offense classified as a Class A1 misdemeanor in North Carolina, the adjudication or conviction is treated as a Class A1 misdemeanor for assigning delinquency history level points.

Proof of Prior Adjudications or Convictions. — A prior adjudication or conviction shall be proved by any of the following methods:

Stipulation of the parties.

An original or copy of the court record of the prior adjudication or conviction.

A copy of records maintained by the Department of Public Safety or by the Division.

Any other method found by the court to be reliable.

The State bears the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that a prior adjudication or conviction exists and that the juvenile before the court is the same person as the juvenile named in the prior adjudication or conviction. The original or a copy of the court records or a copy of the records maintained by the Department of Public Safety or of the Division, bearing the same name as that by which the juvenile is charged, is prima facie evidence that the juvenile named is the same person as the juvenile before the court, and that the facts set out in the record are true. For purposes of this subsection, “a copy” includes a paper writing containing a reproduction of a record maintained electronically on a computer or other data processing equipment, and a document produced by a facsimile machine. The prosecutor shall make all feasible efforts to obtain and present to the court the juvenile’s full record. Evidence presented by either party at trial may be utilized to prove prior adjudications or convictions. If asked by the juvenile, the prosecutor shall furnish the juvenile’s prior adjudications or convictions to the juvenile within a reasonable time sufficient to allow the juvenile to determine if the record available to the prosecutor is accurate.

History.

1998-202, s. 6; 2000-137, s. 3; 2007-168, s. 5; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2014-100, s. 17.1(q); 2015-58, s. 2.3; 2017-57, s. 16D.4(h); 2018-142, s. 23(b).

§ 7B-2508.
Dispositional limits for each class of offense and delinquency history level.

Offense Classification. — The offense classifications are as follows:

Violent — Adjudication of a Class A through E felony offense;

Serious — Adjudication of a Class F through I felony offense or a Class A1 misdemeanor;

Minor — Adjudication of a Class 1, 2, or 3 misdemeanor or adjudication of indirect contempt by a juvenile.

Delinquency History Levels. — A delinquency history level shall be determined for each delinquent juvenile as provided in

G.S. 7B-2507

.

Level 1 — Community Disposition. — A court exercising jurisdiction over a juvenile who has been adjudicated delinquent and for whom the dispositional chart in subsection (f) of this section prescribes a Level 1 disposition may provide for evaluation and treatment under

G.S. 7B-2502

and for any of the dispositional alternatives contained in subdivisions (1) through (13) and (16) of

G.S. 7B-2506

. In determining which dispositional alternative is appropriate, the court shall consider the needs of the juvenile as indicated by the risk and needs assessment contained in the predisposition report, the appropriate community resources available to meet those needs, and the protection of the public.

Level 2 — Intermediate Disposition. — A court exercising jurisdiction over a juvenile who has been adjudicated delinquent and for whom the dispositional chart in subsection (f) of this section prescribes a Level 2 disposition may provide for evaluation and treatment under

G.S. 7B-2502

and for any of the dispositional alternatives contained in subdivisions (1) through (23) of

G.S. 7B-2506

, but shall provide for at least one of the intermediate dispositions authorized in subdivisions (13) through (23) of

G.S. 7B-2506

. However, notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a court may impose a Level 3 disposition if the juvenile has previously received a Level 3 disposition in a prior juvenile action. In determining which dispositional alternative is appropriate, the court shall consider the needs of the juvenile as indicated by the risk and needs assessment contained in the predisposition report, the appropriate community resources available to meet those needs, and the protection of the public.

Level 3 — Commitment. — A court exercising jurisdiction over a juvenile who has been adjudicated delinquent and for whom the dispositional chart in subsection (f) of this section prescribes a Level 3 disposition shall commit the juvenile to the Division for placement in a youth development center in accordance with G.S. 7B-2506(24). However, a court may impose a Level 2 disposition rather than a Level 3 disposition if the court submits written findings on the record that substantiate extraordinary needs on the part of the offending juvenile.

Dispositions for Each Class of Offense and Delinquency History Level; Disposition Chart Described. — The authorized disposition for each class of offense and delinquency history level is as specified in the chart below. Delinquency history levels are indicated horizontally on the top of the chart. Classes of offense are indicated vertically on the left side of the chart. Each cell on the chart indicates which of the dispositional levels described in subsections (c) through (e) of this section are prescribed for that combination of offense classification and delinquency history level:

Click to view

Notwithstanding subsection (f) of this section, a juvenile who has been adjudicated for a minor offense may be committed to a Level 3 disposition if the juvenile has been adjudicated of four or more prior offenses. For purposes of determining the number of prior offenses under this subsection, each successive offense is one that was committed after adjudication of the preceding offense.

(g1)

Notwithstanding subsection (f) of this section, if a juvenile is adjudicated for an offense that the court finds beyond a reasonable doubt was committed as part of criminal gang activity as defined in

G.S. 7B-2508.1

, the juvenile shall receive a disposition one level higher than would otherwise be provided for the class of offense and delinquency history level.

If a juvenile is adjudicated of more than one offense during a session of juvenile court, the court shall consolidate the offenses for disposition and impose a single disposition for the consolidated offenses. The disposition shall be specified for the class of offense and delinquency history level of the most serious offense.

DELINQUENCY HISTORY OFFENSE LOW MEDIUM HIGH VIOLENT Level 2 or 3 Level 3 Level 3 SERIOUS Level 1 or 2 Level 2 Level 2 or 3 MINOR Level 1 Level 1 or 2 Level 2.

History.

1998-202, s. 6; 2000-137, s. 3; 2001-95, s. 5; 2001-179, s. 1; 2007-168, s. 6; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2017-57, s. 16D.4(gg); 2017-197, s. 5.4; 2018-142, s. 23(b); 2019-186, s. 10.